Vermont, session 2025-2026, H183.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 3546 is amended to read:
§ 3546. INVESTIGATION OF VICIOUS DOMESTIC PETS OR WOLF-
HYBRIDS; ORDER
(a) When a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid has bitten a person while the
domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is off the premises of the owner or keeper, and the
person bitten requires medical attention for the attack, the person may file a
written complaint with the legislative body of the municipality. The complaint
shall contain the time, date, and place where the attack occurred, the name and
address of the victim or victims, and any other facts that may assist the
VT LEG #380513 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.183
2025 Page 2 of 5
legislative body in conducting its investigation required by subsection (b) of
this section.
(b) The legislative body, within seven days from receipt of the complaint,
shall investigate the charges and hold a hearing on the matter. If the owner of
the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid that is the subject of the complaint can be
ascertained with due diligence, the owner shall be provided with a written
notice of the time, date, and place of hearing and the facts of the complaint.
(c) If the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is found to have bitten the victim
without provocation, the municipal officials shall make such order for the
protection of persons as the facts and circumstances of the case may require,
including that the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is disposed of in a humane way,
muzzled, chained, or confined. The order shall be sent by certified mail, return
receipt requested. A person who, after receiving notice, fails to comply with
the terms of the order shall be subject to the penalties provided in section 3550
of this chapter.
(d) The procedures provided in this section shall apply if the domestic pet or
wolf-hybrid is not a rabies suspect. If a member of the legislative body or a
municipal official designated by the legislative body determines that the
animal is a rabies suspect, the provisions of subchapter 5 of this chapter and
the rules of the Department of Health shall apply.
VT LEG #380513 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.183
2025 Page 3 of 5
(e) The procedures provided in this section shall not apply if the voters of a
municipality, at a special or annual meeting duly warned for the purpose, have
authorized the legislative body of the municipality to regulate domestic pets or
wolf-hybrids by ordinances that are inconsistent with this section, in which
case those ordinances shall apply. [Repealed.]
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. chapter 193, subchapter 7 is added to read:
Subchapter 7. Damages by Domestic Dogs
§ 3821. CIVIL LIABILITY FOR INJURY CAUSED BY DOMESTIC DOGS
(a) Strict liability. The owner of a domestic dog has a duty to keep that dog
under reasonable control at all times and to keep that dog from running at
large. The owner may be held liable for any injury caused by the dog
regardless of whether the dog has shown any dangerous propensities or
whether the owner knew or should have known of the dog’s dangerous
propensities. A person who breaches the duty imposed by this section shall be
subject to civil liability for any damages suffered by a person who is injured by
the dog or whose domestic pet is injured by the dog while in a public place or
lawfully in or on the private property of another.
(b) Limitations on liability. Subsection (a) of this section shall not be
construed to impose liability upon:
(1) any governmental agency using a dog in military or police work if
the injury occurred during the course of the dog’s official duties; or
VT LEG #380513 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.183
2025 Page 4 of 5
(2) the owner of the dog if:
(A) the injured person was trespassing upon the private property of
the dog’s owner;
(B) the injury occurred while the dog was protecting the dog’s owner
or another innocent party from attack by the injured person or a dog owned by
the injured person;
(C) the injury occurred while the dog was securely confined in a
kennel, a crate, or another enclosure; or
(D) the injury occurred as a result of the injured person enticing,
disturbing, alarming, harassing, or otherwise provoking the dog.
(c) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Domestic pet” has the same meaning as in section 3541 of this title.
(2) “Owner” means a person who, at the time of the damage caused to
another, regularly harbors, keeps, or exercises control over the dog, but does
not include a person who, at the time of the damage, is temporarily harboring,
keeping, or exercising control over the dog.
(3) “Running at large” means a dog goes uncontrolled by the dog’s
owner upon the premises of another without the consent of the owner of the
premises or of another person authorized to give consent or goes uncontrolled
by the owner upon a highway, public road, street, or any other place open to
the public generally.
VT LEG #380513 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.183
2025 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380513 v.1